Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.050

Licenses—Issuance—Renewal—Provisional licenses—Fees—Display—Surrender, relinquishment—Change in licensee—Refusal of renewal, when—Copy of decision.

(1)(a) Upon receipt of an application for license, if the applicant and the facilities of the assisted living facility meet the requirements established under this chapter, the department may issue a license. If there is a failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter, the department may in its discretion issue a provisional license to an applicant for a license or for the renewal of a license. A provisional license permits the operation of the assisted living facility for a period to be determined by the department, but not to exceed twelve months and is not subject to renewal. The department may also place conditions on the license under RCW 18.20.190.

(b) At the time of the application for or renewal of a license or provisional license, the licensee shall pay a license fee. Beginning July 1, 2011, and thereafter, the per bed license fee must be established in the omnibus appropriations act and any amendment or additions made to that act. The license fees established in the omnibus appropriations act and any amendment or additions made to that act may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and must include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(c) A license issued under this chapter may not exceed twelve months in duration and expires on a date set by the department. An assisted living facility license must be issued only to the person that applied for the license. All applications for renewal of a license shall be made not later than thirty days prior to the date of expiration of the license. Each license shall be issued only for the premises and persons named in the application, and no license shall be transferable or assignable. Licenses shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the licensed premises.

(2) A licensee who receives notification of the department's initiation of a denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of an assisted living facility license may, in lieu of appealing the department's action, surrender or relinquish the license. The department shall not issue a new license to or contract with the licensee, for the purposes of providing care to vulnerable adults or children, for a period of twenty years following the surrendering or relinquishment of the former license. The licensing record shall indicate that the licensee relinquished or surrendered the license, without admitting the violations, after receiving notice of the department's initiation of a denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of a license.

(3) The department shall establish, by rule, the circumstances requiring a change in licensee, which include, but are not limited to, a change in ownership or control of the assisted living facility or licensee, a change in the licensee's form of legal organization, such as from sole proprietorship to partnership or corporation, and a dissolution or merger of the licensed entity with another legal organization. The new licensee is subject to the provisions of this chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter, and other applicable law. In order to ensure that the safety of residents is not compromised by a change in licensee, the new licensee is responsible for correction of all violations that may exist at the time of the new license.

(4) The department may deny, suspend, modify, revoke, or refuse to renew a license when the department finds that the applicant or licensee or any partner, officer, director, managerial employee, or majority owner of the applicant or licensee:

(a) Operated an assisted living facility without a license or under a revoked or suspended license; or

(b) Knowingly or with reason to know made a false statement of a material fact (i) in an application for license or any data attached to the application, or (ii) in any matter under investigation by the department; or

(c) Refused to allow representatives or agents of the department to inspect (i) the books, records, and files required to be maintained, or (ii) any portion of the premises of the assisted living facility; or

(d) Willfully prevented, interfered with, or attempted to impede in any way (i) the work of any authorized representative of the department, or (ii) the lawful enforcement of any provision of this chapter; or

(e) Has a history of significant noncompliance with federal or state regulations in providing care or services to vulnerable adults or children. In deciding whether to deny, suspend, modify, revoke, or refuse to renew a license under this section, the factors the department considers shall include the gravity and frequency of the noncompliance.

(5) The department shall serve upon the applicant a copy of the decision granting or denying an application for a license. An applicant shall have the right to contest denial of his or her application for a license as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW by requesting a hearing in writing within twenty-eight days after receipt of the notice of denial.

[ 2012 c 10 s 4; 2011 1st sp.s. c 3 s 402; 2004 c 140 s 1; 2003 c 231 s 4; 2001 c 193 s 10; 2000 c 47 s 3; 1987 c 75 s 3; 1982 c 201 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 247 s 1; 1957 c 253 s 5.]

NOTES:

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 3 ss 401-403: See note following RCW 18.51.050.

Finding—Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 3: See note following RCW 70.128.005.

Findings—Effective date—2003 c 231: See notes following RCW 18.20.020.

Effective date—2000 c 47: See note following RCW 18.20.020.

Savings—1987 c 75: See RCW 43.20B.900.